test/src/morphology/N-aeqddwl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äʼddõl: # Noun 236 'eng /est ädal/fin' - full paradigm
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Nom: äʼddõl
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Gen: äʼddõl
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Par: äʼddõlt
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Dat: äʼddõlõn
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Ins: äʼddõlõks
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Ill: äʼddõlõ
     äʼddõl+N+Sg+Ela: äʼddõlõst
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Nom: äʼddõld
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Gen: äʼddõld
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Par: äʼddiļi
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Dat: äʼddõldõn
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Ins: äʼddõldõks
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Ill: äʼddiļiž
     äʼddõl+N+Pl+Ela: äʼddiļist
